it: Autenticazione/classificazione delle banconote: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Non valutata; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Altro
sk-SK: Overovanie pravosti/hodnotenie bankoviek: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Neohodnotené; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Iné
es: Autenticación/clasificación de billetes: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Sin clasificar; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Otra
pt-BR: Autenticação/classificação de cédulas bancárias: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Não classificada; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Outro
cs: Ověřování/klasifikace bankovek: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Nehodnoceno; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Jiné
sv: Sedelautentisering/kvalitetskontroll: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Ej graderad; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Övrigt
fi: Setelien aitouden tarkastus/luokittelu: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Ei arvioitu; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Muu
fr: Authentification et classement des billets: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Non évalué; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Autre
vi: Xác thực/phân loại tiền giấy: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Chưa phân loại; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Khác
pt-PT: Autenticação/classificação de notas bancárias: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Não classificada; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Outro
tr: Banknot doğrulama/derecelendirmesi: ANACS; CGS (Bankanot Derecelendirme ve Kimlik Doğrulama); ICG (Bağımsız Madeni Para Derecelendiricileri); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Derecelendirilmemiş; PCGS Banknot; PMG (Kağıt Para Garantisi); Diğer
zh-CN: 纸币鉴定/评级: ANACS; CGS（货币评级与鉴定）; ICG（独立硬币评级机构）; 传统货币评级 (LCG); 未评级; PCGS 纸币; PMG（纸币鉴定评级）; 其他
el: Γνησιότητα/ταξινόμησης τραπεζογραμματίων: ANACS; CGS (Αξιολόγηση και πιστοποίηση νομισμάτων); ICG (Ανεξάρτητοι αξιολογητές νομισμάτων); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Χωρίς αξιολόγηση; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Άλλο
de: Echtheitsprüfung/Grading von Banknoten: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Nicht bewertet; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Sonstige
en: Banknote authentication/grading: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Not graded; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Other
da: Autentificering og gradueringsklassificering af pengesedler: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Ikke-vurderet; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Andet
pl: Uwierzytelnienie/ocena banknotu: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Nieoceniane; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Inne
ru: Аутентификация/оценка банкноты: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Без оценки; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Другое
ro-RO: Autentificarea/clasificarea bancnotelor: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Neevaluat; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Altele
th: การตรวจสอบความแท้/ประเมินเกรดธนบัตร: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); ไม่ได้รับการจัดเกรด; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Provjera autentičnosti / ocjenjivanje novčanica: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Neocijenjeno; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Ostalo
nl: Bankbiljet authenticatie/-gradering: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Niet beoordeeld; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Overig
ko: 지폐 감정/등급: ANACS; CGS(Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG(Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading(LCG); 미등급; PCGS Banknote; PMG(Paper Money Guaranty); 기타
ja: 紙幣の認証／格付け: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); 未グレーディング; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); その他
sl-SI: Preverjanje pristnosti in ocenjevanje bankovcev: ANACS; CGS (ocenjevanje in preverjanje pristnosti valut); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Ni ocenjeno; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Drugo
nb: Seddelautentisering/gradering: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Ikke gradert; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Annet
zh-TW: 紙幣認證/評級: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); 未評級; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); 其他
bg-BG: Автентикация и оценка на банкноти: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Без оценка; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Друго
lt-LT: Banknotų autentiškumo tikrinimas / rūšiavimas: ANACS; CGS („Currency Grading and Authentication“); ICG („Independent Coin Graders“); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Neįvertinta; PCGS Banknote; PMG („Paper Money Guaranty“); Kita
hu: Bankjegy-hitelesítés/osztályozás: ANACS; CGS (Currency Grading and Authentication); ICG (Independent Coin Graders); Legacy Currency Grading (LCG); Nem minősített; PCGS Banknote; PMG (Paper Money Guaranty); Egyéb